Utah statutes.
59-10-103.1.    Information to be contained on individual income tax returns or booklets.

(1)  The commission shall print the phrase "all state income tax dollars fund education" on:

(a)  the first page of an individual income tax return; and

(b)  the cover page of an individual income tax forms and instructions booklet.

(2)  The commission shall include on an individual income tax return a statement for a property owner to declare that the property owner no longer qualifies to receive a residential exemption authorized under Section 59-2-103 for that property owner's primary residence.

